Washington statutes.
RCW 43.190.120

Expenditure of funds on long-term care ombuds program.

It is the intent that federal requirements be complied with and the department annually expend at least one percent of the state's allotment of social services funds from Title III B of the older Americans act of 1965, as it exists as of July 24, 1983, or twenty thousand dollars, whichever is greater to establish the state long-term care ombuds program established by this chapter if funds are appropriated by the legislature.

[ 2013 c 23 s 98; 1983 c 290 s 12.]